Massachusetts, session 194th, H3296.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Division of
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance shall be directed to open the entire length of the
road, known as Cobble Mountain Road, that runs adjacent to the east side of Cobble Mountain
Reservoir, in the towns known as Blandford, Granville, and Russell. Hereinafter referred to as
"the road." The road will remain open for recreational purposes to include pedestrian foot traffic,
bicycle traffic , and equestrian traffic.
SECTION 2. The Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance may restrict
the recreational use of the road during certain hours, provided the road remain open daily from
sunrise to sunset to allow for pedestrian foot traffic, bicycle traffic , and equestrian traffic.
of 2

SECTION 3. (a) The Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance shall
visibly post signage indicating the road is open to pedestrian, bicycle, and equestrian traffic
along with any restrictions of use.
(b) Said signage shall be posted at the intersection of Cobble Mountain, Hayden, and
Crooks Roads in the town known as Blandford; and at the intersection of Cobble Mountain and
Wildcat roads in the town known as Granville.
of 2